Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 15
DISPOSITION OF ASSETS

7-58-1501. Disposition of assets not requiring member approval.

Unless the articles of organization otherwise provide, member approval under section 7-58-1502 is not required for a limited cooperative association to:

Sell, lease, exchange, license, or otherwise dispose of all or any part of the assets of the association in the usual and regular course of business; or

Mortgage, pledge, dedicate to the repayment of indebtedness, or otherwise encumber in any way all or any part of the assets of the association, whether or not in the usual and regular course of business.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 811, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-1502. Member approval of other disposition or encumbrance of assets.

A sale, lease, exchange, license, or other disposition of assets or an encumbrance of assets of a limited cooperative association, other than a disposition or encumbrance described in section 7-58-1501, requires approval of the association's members under sections 7-58-1503 and 7-58-1504.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 811, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-1503. Notice and action on disposition or encumbrance of assets.

For a limited cooperative association to dispose of or encumber assets under section 7-58-1502:

A majority of the board of directors, or a greater percentage if required by the articles or bylaws, must approve the proposed disposition or encumbrance; and

The board of directors must call a members meeting to consider the proposed disposition or encumbrance, hold the meeting not later than ninety days after approval of the proposed disposition or encumbrance by the board, and mail or otherwise transmit or deliver in a record to each member:

The terms of the proposed disposition or encumbrance;

A recommendation that the members approve the disposition or encumbrance or, if the board determines that because of conflict of interest or any other reason it should not make a favorable recommendation, the basis for that determination;

A statement of any condition of the board's submission of the proposed disposition or encumbrance to the members; and

Notice of the meeting at which the proposed disposition or encumbrance will be considered, which notice must be given in the same manner as notice of a special meeting of members.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 811, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-1504. Disposition or encumbrance of assets.

Subject to subsection (2) of this section, a disposition or encumbrance of assets under section 7-58-1502 must be approved by:

At least a majority of the voting power of members present at a members meeting called under section 7-58-1503 (1)(b); and

If the limited cooperative association has investor members, at least a majority of the votes cast by patron members, unless the articles or bylaws require a greater percentage vote by patron members.

The articles or bylaws may require that the percentage of votes required under paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section is:

A different percentage that is not less than a majority of members voting at the meeting;

Measured against the voting power of all members; or

A combination of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (2).

Subject to any contractual obligations, after a disposition or encumbrance of assets is approved and at any time before the consummation of the disposition or encumbrance, a limited cooperative association may approve an amendment to the contract for the disposition or encumbrance or the resolution authorizing the disposition or encumbrance or approve abandonment of the disposition or encumbrance:

As provided in the contract or the resolution; and

Except as limited or prohibited by the resolution, with the same affirmative vote of the board of directors and of the members as was required to approve the disposition or encumbrance.

The voting requirements for districts, classes, or voting groups under section 7-58-404 apply to approval of a disposition of assets under this part 15.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 812, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.